North Carolina, session 2025, HB855.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-270.20(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Teacher Licenses. – The State Board shall adopt rules for the issuance of the following
classes of teacher licenses, including required levels of preparation for each classification:
…
(5) Residency License or RL. – A one-year license, renewable twice, that meets
both of the following requirements:
a. Is requested by the governing body of a public school unit and
accompanied by a certification of supervision from the recognized
educator preparation program in which the individual is enrolled.either
of the following entities and is accompanied by a certification of
supervision from the recognized educator preparation program in
which the individual is enrolled:
1. The governing body of a public school unit.
2. A nonpublic school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or
Part 2 of Article 39 of this Chapter.
3. A nonpublic school approved and monitored by the
Department of Public Instruction that provides services for
students with extraordinary costs. For the purposes of this
subsection, extraordinary costs shall include costs directly
attributable to providing the special education services on the
student's IEP.
b. The individual for whom the license is requested meets all of the
following requirements:
1. Holds at least one of the following:
I. A bachelor's degree.
II. An advanced degree.
2. Has either completed coursework relevant to the requested
licensure area or passed the content area examination relevant
to the requested licensure area that has been approved by the
State Board.
3. Is enrolled in a recognized educator preparation program.
*H855-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
4. Meets all other requirements established by the State Board,
including completing preservice requirements prior to
teaching.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to applications
for residency licenses occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 855-First Edition